Utah statutes.
48-2e-903.   Foreign registration statement.

To register to do business in this state, a foreign limited partnership must deliver a foreign registration statement to the division for filing.  The statement must state:

(1)  the name of the foreign limited partnership and, if the name does not comply with Section 48-2e-108, an alternate name adopted pursuant to Subsection 48-2e-906(1);

(2)  that the limited partnership is a foreign limited partnership;

(3)  the name of the foreign limited partnership's jurisdiction of formation;

(4)  the street and mailing addresses of the foreign limited partnership's principal office and, if the law of the foreign limited partnership's jurisdiction of formation requires the foreign limited partnership to maintain an office in that jurisdiction, the street and mailing addresses of the required office; and

(5)  the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

